sl-SI: Glavna uporaba jedi: Kruh; Piškoti in browniji; Cmoki in wontoni; Gyoza; Pite in pecivo; Pica; Siomai ali shumai; Spomladanski in jajčni zvitki; Tamale; Tortilje; Drugo
pl: Podstawowe zastosowanie dania: Chleb; Ciasteczka i brownie; Pierogi i wonton; Gyoza; Ciasta i wypieki; Pizza; Siomai lub shumai; Sajgonki; Tamales; Tortille; Inne
tr: Ana yemek uygulaması: Ekmek; Kurabiye ve browni; Mantı ve wonton; Gyoza; Turta ve hamur işi; Pizza; Siomai veya shumai; Çin böreği ve yumurta rulosu; Tamale; Tortilla; Diğer
fi: Ensisijainen ruokalaji: Leipä; Keksit ja browniet; Taikinanyytit ja wontonit; Gyoza; Piirakat ja leivonnaiset; Pizza; Siomai tai shumai; Kevätkääryleet ja munakääryleet; Tamalet; Tortillat; Muu
bg-BG: Основно предназначение на съда: Хляб; Бисквити и браунита; Дъмплинг и уонтон; Гьоза; Пай и печива; Пица; Шиумай или шумай; Пролетни и яйчени ролца; Тамале; Тортили; Друго
sv: Primärt användningsområde för maträtt: Bröd; Kakor och brownies; Dumplings och wontons; Gyoza; Paj och bakverk; Pizza; Siomai eller shumai; Vårrullar och äggrullar; Tamales; Tortillas; Övrigt
fr: Plat ou préparation principale: Pain; Biscuits et brownies; Dumplings et wontons; Gyoza; Tarte et pâtisserie; Pizza; Siomai ou shumai; Rouleaux de printemps et pâtés impériaux; Tamales; Tortillas; Autre
de: Hauptverwendungszweck des Gerichts: Brot; Kekse und Brownies; Dumplings und Wan Tans; Gyoza; Kuchen und Gebäck; Pizza; Siomai oder Shumai; Frühlingsrollen und Eierrollen; Tamales; Tortillas; Sonstige
el: Κύρια χρήση σε πιάτο: Ψωμί; Μπισκότα και μπράουνις; Ντάμπλινγκς και γουόντον; Γκιόζα; Πίτες και ζύμες; Πίτσα; Σιουμάι; Σπρινγκ ρολς και εγκ ρολς; Ταμάλες; Τορτίγιες; Άλλο
zh-TW: 主要料理用途: 麵包; 餅乾與布朗尼; 水餃與餛飩; 煎餃; 派與糕點; 披薩; 燒賣; 春捲與蛋捲; 墨西哥粽; 墨西哥薄餅; 其他
cs: Aplikace primárního jídla: Chléb; Sušenky a brownies; Knedlíky a wontony; Gyoza; Koláče a pečivo; Pizza; Siomai nebo shumai; Jarní a vaječné závitky; Tamales; Tortilly; Ostatní
en: Primary dish application: Bread; Cookies and brownies; Dumplings and wontons; Gyoza; Pie and pastry; Pizza; Siomai or shumai; Spring rolls and egg rolls; Tamales; Tortillas; Other
pt-PT: Aplicação principal do prato: Pão; Bolachas e brownies; Dumplings e wontons; Gyoza; Tartes e pastelaria; Pizza; Siomai ou shumai; Crepes primavera e rolos de ovo; Tamales; Tortillas; Outra
ru: Основное применение теста: Хлеб; Печенье и брауни; Пельмени и вонтоны; Гёдза; Пироги и выпечка; Пицца; Шаомай; Спринг-роллы и эгг-роллы; Тамале; Тортильи; Другое
da: Primær anvendelse til ret: Brød; Småkager og brownies; Dumplings og wontons; Gyoza; Tærte og bagværk; Pizza; Siomai eller shumai; Forårsruller og æggeruller; Tamales; Tortillas; Anden
ja: メイン料理での用途: パン; クッキー・ブラウニー; 餃子・ワンタン; 餃子; パイ・ペストリー; ピザ; 焼売; 春巻き・エッグロール; タマレス; トルティーヤ; その他
hr-HR: Primarna aplikacija za jelo: Kruh; Kolačići i browniji; Okruglice i wontoni; Gyoza; Pite i peciva; Pizza; Siomai ili shumai; Proljetne rolice i rolice od jaja; Tamalesi; Tortilje; Ostalo
lt-LT: Pagrindinė patiekalo paskirtis: Duona; Sausainiai ir šokoladiniai pyragaičiai; Koldūnai ir vontonai; Gyoza; Pyragai ir kepiniai; Pica; Siomai ar shumai; Pavasariniai suktinukai ir kiaušinių suktinukai; Tamalės; Tortilijos; Kita
zh-CN: 主要餐具适用场景: 面包; 饼干和布朗尼; 饺子和馄饨; 煎饺; 派和糕点; 披萨; 烧麦; 春卷和蛋卷; 墨西哥粽 (Tamales); 墨西哥薄饼; 其他
nb: Rett for primærbruk: Brød; Kjeks og brownies; Dumplings og wontons; Gyoza; Pai og bakverk; Pizza; Siomai eller shumai; Vårruller og eggruller; Tamales; Tortillas; Annet
pt-BR: Aplicação principal do prato: Pão; Cookies e brownies; Bolinhos e wontons; Guioza; Torta e massa folhada; Pizza; Siumai ou shumai; Rolinhos primavera e rolinhos de ovo; Tamales; Tortillas; Outra
es: Aplicación de plato principal: Pan; Galletas y brownies; Dumplings y wontons; Gyoza; Tarta y hojaldre; Pizza; Siomai o shumai; Rollitos de primavera y rollos de huevo; Tamales; Tortillas; Otro
ro-RO: Aplicație principală pentru preparate: Pâine; Biscuiți și negrese; Găluște și wonton; Gyoza; Plăcinte și produse de patiserie; Pizza; Siomai sau shumai; Pachețele de primăvară și rulouri cu ou; Tamales; Tortillas; Altele
hu: Elsődleges ételalkalmazás: Kenyér; Sütik és brownie-k; Gombócok és wontonok; Gyoza; Piték és péksütemények; Pizza; Siomai vagy shumai; Tavaszi tekercsek és tojástekercsek; Tamale; Tortillák; Egyéb
sk-SK: Primárna pokrmová aplikácia: Chlieb; Sušienky a brownies; Knedličky a wontony; Gyoza; Koláče a pečivo; Pizza; Siomai alebo shumai; Jarné a vaječné závitky; Tamales; Tortilly; Iné
ko: 주요 요리 용도: 빵; 쿠키 및 브라우니; 만두 및 완탕; 교자; 파이 및 페이스트리; 피자; 샤오마이 또는 슈마이; 스프링 롤 및 에그 롤; 타말레; 토르티야; 기타
nl: Primaire gerechttoepassing: Brood; Koekjes en brownies; Dumplings en wontons; Gyoza; Taart en gebak; Pizza; Siomai of shumai; Loempia's en eggrolls; Tamales; Tortilla's; Anders
vi: Ứng dụng món ăn chính: Bánh mì; Bánh quy và bánh brownie; Bánh chẻo và hoành thánh; Gyoza; Bánh nướng và bánh ngọt; Pizza; Xíu mại; Chả giò và chả giò trứng; Bánh tamale; Bánh tortilla; Khác
it: Applicazione principale del piatto: Pane; Biscotti e brownie; Ravioli e wonton; Gyoza; Torte e pasticcini; Pizza; Siomai o shumai; Involtini primavera e involtini all'uovo; Tamales; Tortillas; Altro
th: แอปพลิเคชันจานหลัก: ขนมปัง; คุกกี้และบราวนี่; เกี๊ยวและเกี๊ยวน้ำ; เกี๊ยวซ่า; พายและเพสตรี้; พิซซ่า; ขนมจีบ; ปอเปี๊ยะและปอเปี๊ยะไข่; ทามาลี; ตอร์ติญ่า; อื่นๆ